Utah statutes.
58-50-2.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Private Probation Provider Licensing Board created in
Section 58-50-3.
(2)  "Court" means the particular court which orders probation in a case.
(3)  "Private probation" means the preparation of presentence investigation
reports and the performance of supervision services by a private probation
provider and funded by a court-ordered fee, to be paid by the defendant,
pursuant to Section 77-18-1.
(4) (a)  "Private probation provider" means any private individual preparing
presentence investigation reports or providing probation supervision pursuant
to court order under Section 77-18-1 and who is licensed under this chapter,
and whose services are limited to minor offenses and misdemeanor violations.
(b)  A private probation provider does not have the authority of a peace
officer.
(5)  "Unprofessional conduct" as defined in Section 58-1-501 and as may be
further defined by rule includes:
(a)  failure to disclose any financial or personal interest or prior
relationship with parties that affects the private probation provider's
impartiality or otherwise constitutes a conflict of interest;
(b)  providing contract probation services when any financial or personal
interest or prior relationship with parties affects the private probation
provider's impartiality or otherwise constitutes an actual conflict of
interest;
(c)  failure to clearly define to the offender the services provided by the
private probation provider, the rules of conduct, the criteria used, and the
fees charged;
(d)  failure to provide adequate supervision, or supervision as ordered by the
court, as determined by the division in collaboration with the board; and
(e)  failure to comply with the standards specified in Section 58-50-9.
